Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska59-1717
Seller-assisted marketing plan; sales under certain license; excluded.

A seller-assisted marketing plan shall not include a license granted by a general merchandise retailer which allows the licensee to sell goods, equipment, supplies, products, or services to the general public under the retailer's trademark, trade name, or service mark when the general merchandise retailer has been doing business continuously for five years prior to the granting of the license.

Laws 1979, LB 180, § 17.